Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2104.03
Advisory committee; submit plan
for early childhood education programs for children in poverty; powers and
duties.

The
advisory committee described in section 79-2104.01 shall submit a plan as
provided in subdivision (5) of section 79-2104.01 to the learning community
coordinating council for any early childhood education programs for children
in poverty and the services to be provided by such programs. In developing
the plan, the advisory committee shall seek input from member school districts
and community resources and collaborate with such resources in order to maximize
the available opportunities and resources for such programs. The advisory
committee may, as part of such plan, recommend services to be provided through
contract with, or grants to, school districts to provide or contract for some
or all of the services. The advisory committee shall take special efforts
to establish early childhood education programs for children in poverty so
that such programs are readily available and accessible to children and families
located in areas with a high concentration of poverty.

Laws 2013, LB585, § 5.